Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4833
Manner of making, amending, or revoking
anatomical gift of decedent's body or part.

(a) A person authorized to make an anatomical
gift under section 71-4832 may make an anatomical gift by a document of gift
signed by the person making the gift or by that person's oral communication
that is electronically recorded or is contemporaneously reduced to a record
and signed by the individual receiving the oral communication.

(b) Subject
to subsection (c) of this section, an anatomical gift by a person authorized
under section 71-4832 may be amended or revoked orally or in a record by any
member of a prior class who is reasonably available. If more than one member
of the prior class is reasonably available, the gift made by a person authorized
under section 71-4832 may be:

(1) Amended only if a majority of the reasonably
available members agree to the amending of the gift; or

(2) Revoked
only if a majority of the reasonably available members agree to the revoking
of the gift or if they are equally divided as to whether to revoke the gift.

(c) A revocation
under subsection (b) of this section is effective only if, before an incision
has been made to remove a part from the donor's body or before invasive procedures
have begun to prepare the recipient, the procurement organization, transplant
hospital, or physician or technician knows of the revocation.

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 10.